Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-222
Medical examination as condition of employment; violation; penalty.

Any employer who violates the provisions of section 48-221 shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor. Each violation shall constitute a separate offense. It shall be the duty of the Commissioner of Labor to enforce the provisions of sections 48-220 to 48-223.

Laws 1963, c. 280, § 3, p. 837;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 278.